Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-439
Approval by the convening authority.

In acting on the findings and sentence of a court-martial, the convening authority may approve only such findings of guilty, and the sentence or such part or amount of the sentence, as he finds correct in law and fact and as he in his discretion determines should be approved. Unless he indicates otherwise, approval of the sentence is approval of the findings and sentence.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 39, p. 1570.